California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) A permitholder who fails to surrender a seller’s permit upon transfer of a business shall be liable for any tax, interest, and penalty incurred by the transferee if the permitholder has actual or constructive knowledge that the transferee is using the permit in any manner. The predecessor’s liability shall be limited to the quarter in which the business is transferred, and the three subsequent quarters.

(b) The limitation on liability provided for in subdivision (a)
 shall not apply in cases where, after the transfer, 80 percent or more of the real or ultimate ownership of the business transferred is held by the predecessor.

(c) For purposes of this section, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or other persons holding an ownership interest in a corporation or other entity shall be regarded as having the “real or ultimate ownership” of the property of the corporation or other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1109, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6072.

A permit shall be held only by persons actively engaging in or conducting a business as a seller of tangible personal property. Any person not so engaged shall forthwith surrender his or her permit to the board for cancellation. The board may revoke the permit of a person found to be not actively engaged in or conducting a business as a seller of tangible personal property.

Any person who knowingly issues a resale certificate while the person is not actively engaged in business as a seller, for personal gain or to evade the payment of taxes, shall be liable for the taxes that would otherwise have been due on
 the transaction, plus a penalty of 10 percent or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, in addition to all other penalties imposed by this part, and interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.

(a) (1) When the board determines it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the board may require the operator of a swap meet, flea market, or special event as a prerequisite to renting or leasing space on the premises owned or controlled by that operator to a person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller, to obtain written evidence that the seller is the holder of a valid seller’s permit issued pursuant to Section 6067, or a written statement from the seller that he or she is not
 offering for sale any item that is taxable under this part or is otherwise not required to hold a valid seller’s permit.

(2) In providing the board with documentation required by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), an operator of a swap meet, flea market, or special event may require each person desiring to engage in or conduct business as a seller at that swap meet, flea market, or special event to provide his or her driver’s license number to the operator on a form authorized by the board or under Section 6073.1.

(b) At any time as the board may specify in a written notice, but in no case more than three times in a calendar year, the board may require an operator to submit to the board a list of vendors conducting business on their premises as a seller. Each listing shall be provided to the board within 30 days after the date of the board’s notice. The list shall contain the
 name and seller’s permit number for permitholders and the name, address, and driver’s license number for vendors who do not have seller’s permits. Records shall be retained to the same extent as all transactions involving sales or use tax liability as provided in Section 7053.

(c) “Swap meet, flea market, or special event,” as used in this section, means an activity involving a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute a regular course of business, or any event at which two or more persons offer tangible personal property for sale or exchange and at which a fee is charged for the privilege of displaying the property for sale or exchange or at which a fee is charged to prospective buyers for admission to the area where the property is offered or displayed for sale or exchange.

(d) Any operator of a swap meet, flea market, or special event who fails or
 refuses to comply with this section is subject to a penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.1.

An operator of a swap meet or flea market, as defined in Section 6073, or special event, who verifies that a seller has a valid seller’s permit, or who obtains from the seller a certificate that the seller is not offering for sale any item that is taxable under this part and who completes the form requirements of Section 21663 of the Business and Professions Code, shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of Section 6073. No additional forms will be required by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1138, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.2.

(a) Section 6073 shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) An event or show for which all exhibitors’ contracts prohibit any sale of tangible personal property at the event or show and at which no tangible personal property is actually sold.

(2) An event or show that is conducted for informational or educational purposes only, and at which no sales of tangible personal property occur.

(3) A trade show.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “trade show” means an event or show that complies with all of the following conditions:

(1) The event or show is not open to the general public for any portion of the show.

(2) Only orders for tangible personal property are solicited or taken during the event or show from sellers, as defined in Section 6014, for purposes of subsequent resale.

(3) The event or show is operated by an organization that qualifies for tax exempt status under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) When the board determines it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the
 board may require the operator of a trade show, within 10 days from the close of that show, to provide the board with a listing of the names and addresses of the agents or representatives soliciting orders at the trade show, and their principals, including, but not limited to, manufacturers, wholesalers, distributors, or suppliers.

(d) Any operator of a trade show who willfully fails or refuses to comply with subdivision (c) is subject to a penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   Effective September 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6074.

(a) When the board determines it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the board may, by written notice, require any person making sales to operators of catering trucks, operated out of that person’s facility pursuant to Section 114295 of the Health and Safety Code, who resell the property in the regular course of his or her business, to obtain evidence that the operator is the holder of a valid seller’s permit issued pursuant to Section 6067.

At any time as the board may
 specify in a written notice, but in no case more than three times in a calendar year, the board may require a person making sales to operators of catering trucks to submit to the board a listing of operators of catering trucks who purchase goods from that person. Each listing shall be provided to the board within 30 days after the date of the board’s notice, and shall include the name and seller’s permit number on file of each operator, or, for those operators who do not provide evidence of a valid seller’s permit, the operator’s name, address, and telephone number.

The board may also, by written notice, require a person making sales to operators of catering trucks to promptly notify the board if a newly purchasing operator does not provide to the person, within 30 days of the date of the first purchase, evidence of a valid seller’s permit.

Persons required by written notice of the board to obtain evidence, or provide a
 listing or notification, who fail to comply, may be subject to a penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each failure.

(b) Persons making sales to operators of catering trucks who do not have valid seller’s permits or whose permits have been revoked shall report and pay the tax on property as if the property were sold at retail at the time of the sale. Nothing in this section shall relieve any operator of a catering truck of his or her obligations as a seller under this part.

(c) If the board finds that a person’s failure to comply with this section is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty imposed by this section.

Any person seeking to be relieved of the
 penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases his or her claim for relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 413.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6075.

(a) No permit shall be required of any person who engages in business in this state as a seller of feed, for any form of animal life, that is exempt from taxation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6358 and who engages in no other taxable sales of tangible personal property at retail.

(b) In the case of any seller of hay who is also a grower of hay, the exemption provided in subdivision (a) shall apply only to growers who are either of the following:

(1) A grower who produces hay for sale only to beef cattle feedlots or dairies.

(2) A grower who sells exclusively through a farmer-owned cooperative.

(c) Nothing in this section shall relieve any grower of hay that is not exempt pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6358 from obtaining a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.   Operative April 1, 1996, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 696.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.

(a) Any retail florist who fails to obtain a permit before engaging in or conducting business as a seller shall, in addition to any other applicable penalty, pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) Every mobile retail florist shall have a copy of the permit at each sales location which shall be in the possession of a person operating at that location.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following
 terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Retail florist” means any person selling any flowers, potted ornamental plants, floral arrangements, floral bouquets, wreaths, or any similar products at retail. “Retail florist” does not include any flower or ornamental plant grower who sells his or her own products.

(2) “Mobile retail florist” means any retail florist who does not sell from a structure or retail shop, including, but not limited to, a florist who sells from a vehicle, pushcart, wagon, or other portable method, or who sells at a swap meet, flea market, or similar transient location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 322.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Presumptions and Resale Certificates [6091. - 6095.]

6091.

For the purpose of the proper administration of this part and to prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all gross receipts are subject to the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of tangible personal property is not a sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale unless he takes from the purchaser a certificate to the effect that the property is purchased for resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.

The certificate relieves the seller from liability for sales tax only if taken in good faith from a person who is engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property and who holds the permit provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person, other than a person exempt from payment of use tax in accordance with Section 6352, who leases mobile transportation equipment and who cannot otherwise properly issue a resale certificate may issue such a certificate for the limited purpose of reporting his use tax liability based on fair rental value as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 6094 and subdivision (d) of Section 6244. With respect to matters arising out of mergers or acquisitions, the provisions of this section shall apply to any matters pending before the board on the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.5.

(a) Every qualified person making any sale of a mobilehome or commercial coach required to be registered annually under the Health and Safety Code, or of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code or subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, or a vehicle that qualifies under the permanent trailer identification plate program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code,
 or of any salvage certificate vehicle as defined in Section 11515 of the Vehicle Code, is presumed to be making a sale at retail and not a sale for resale. The presumption may be rebutted by taking a resale certificate from any of the following:

(1) A person that certifies it is licensed, registered, regulated, or certificated under the Health and Safety Code or the Vehicle Code as a dealer or dismantler.

(2) A person that certifies it is licensed, registered, regulated, or certificated under the Business and Professions Code as an automotive repair dealer, or is qualified as a scrap metal processor as described in the Vehicle Code.

(3) A person that certifies it is licensed, registered, regulated, certificated, or otherwise authorized by another state, country, or jurisdiction to do business as a dealer, dismantler,
 automotive repairer, or scrap metal processor.

(b) A qualified person shall not accept a resale certificate from any person except as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) In addition to the requirements of Sections 6093 and 6243, the certificate shall include the license or registration number of the dealer, dismantler, or automotive repair dealer, as applicable. If the purchaser is not required to hold a seller’s permit because the purchaser makes no sales in this state, the purchaser must include on the certificate a sufficient explanation as to the reason the purchaser is not required to hold a California seller’s permit in lieu of the seller’s permit number. The certificate issued by a purchaser pursuant to this section shall be substantially in such form as the board may prescribe.

(2) A
 qualified person that does not timely obtain a resale certificate as provided in this section may use alternative methods as prescribed by the board to rebut the presumption provided in subdivision (a).

(d) For the purposes of this section, a “qualified person” means a person making a sale at auction or a dismantler licensed under the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 756, Sec. 1.   (AB 2618)   Effective September 29, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6093.

The certificate shall be signed by and bear the name and address of the purchaser, shall indicate the number of the permit issued to the purchaser, and shall indicate the general character of the tangible personal property sold by the purchaser in the regular course of business. The certificate shall be substantially in such form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6094.

(a) If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes any use of the property other than retention, demonstration, or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business, the use shall be taxable to the purchaser under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of this part as of the time the property is first used by him, and, except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of this section, the sales price of the property to him shall be the measure of the tax.

(b) If such use is limited to the loan of the property to
 customers as an accommodation while awaiting delivery of property purchased or leased from the lender or while property is being repaired for customers by the lender, the measure of the tax is the fair rental value of the property for the duration of each loan so made.

(c) If the property is used frequently for purposes of demonstration or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business and is used partly for other purposes, the measure of the tax is the fair rental value of the property for the period of such other use or uses.

(d) If the property is mobile transportation equipment as defined in Section 6023, and the use is limited to leasing the equipment, the purchaser may elect to pay his use tax measured by the fair rental value, if the election is made on or before the due date of a return for the period in which the equipment is first leased. The
 election must be made by reporting tax measured by the fair rental value on the return for that period, or in such other manner as the board may prescribe. Tax must thereafter be paid with the return for each reporting period, measured by the fair rental value, whether the equipment is within or without the state. The election may not be revoked with respect to the equipment as to which it is made.

(e) As used in subdivision (d), the term “fair rental value” means the rentals required by the purchaser under the lease except where the board determines that such rentals are nominal. The term shall not include any reimbursement payments made by the lessee to the purchaser for such use tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1352, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

6094.1.

If a purchaser acquires property in a transaction described in subdivision (a) of Section 6006.5 and leases such property, the purchaser may elect at the time the property is first leased by him, after the effective date of this section, to pay use tax measured by the purchase price of the property. Purchaser shall include a transferee who acquires property in a transaction which qualifies under the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 6006.5 and, for purposes hereof, the purchase price of the transferee shall be the same as that paid by the original purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6094.5.

Except as provided in Sections 6012.8 and 6012.9:

(a) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives a resale certificate for property which he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be resold by him or her or the corporation in the regular course of business for the purpose of evading payment to the seller of the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 7153.

(b) Any person, including any
 officer or employee of a corporation, who gives a resale certificate for property which he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be resold by him or her or the corporation in the regular course of business is liable to the state for the amount of tax that would be due if he or she had not given such resale certificate. In addition to the tax, the person shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or five hundred dollars ($500) whichever is greater, for each purchase made for personal gain or to evade the payment of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1490, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6095.

If a purchaser gives a certificate with respect to the purchase of fungible goods, or purchases those goods for resale in the regular course of business, and thereafter commingles these goods with other fungible goods not so purchased but of such similarity that the identity of the constituent goods in the commingled mass cannot be determined, sales from the mass of commingled goods shall be deemed to be sales of the goods so purchased until a quantity of commingled goods equal to the quantity of purchased goods so commingled has been sold. Goods removed from the commingled mass for consumption shall be deemed to be a consumption of goods not so
 purchased until a quantity of commingled goods equal to the quantity of goods not so purchased has been consumed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 337, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Inclusion of Support Services in Sales Tax [6150. - 6172.]

6150.

For purposes of this article, notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6001), the following words have the following meanings in extending the sales tax to support services:

(a) “County” means a county, city and county, or a public authority or nonprofit consortium, as defined in Section 12301.6 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code.

(b) “Gross receipts” means the total amount of the sales of a provider, valued in money, whether paid in money or otherwise, without any deduction for the cost of materials used, any costs of transportation of the provider, or any other expenses. “Gross receipts” shall not include a supplementary payment received by a provider pursuant to Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) “Personal care services” means (1) assistance with ambulation, (2) bathing, oral hygiene, and grooming, (3) dressing, (4) care and assistance with prosthetic devices, (5) bowel, bladder, and menstrual care, (6) repositioning, skin care, range of motion exercises, and transfers, (7) feeding and assurance of adequate fluid intake, (8) respiration, and (9) assistance with self-administration of medications.

(d) (1) “Provider” means a natural person who is authorized by law to provide all of the support services defined in subdivision (i) and who makes a retail sale.

(2) “Provider” also means a nongovernmental person that arranges for the retail sale of all support services defined in subdivision (i). When this definition applies, any natural person described by paragraph (1) who provides services under the direction of the nongovernmental person is not a provider.

(e) “Recipient” means a natural person who receives support services.

(f) “Retail sale” means a sale to a recipient.

(g) “Sale” means the furnishing of support services for a consideration.

(h) “Seller” includes the State
 Department of Social Services in its capacity as the state agency that oversees the In-Home Supportive Services program, or a county in which county staff serve as homemakers pursuant to Section 12302 of the Welfare and Institutions Code in those instances where the department is not the seller, or a county that contracts with a nongovernmental contractor to arrange for the retail sale of support services to eligible recipients pursuant to Section 12301.6 or 12302 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other nongovernmental person that arranges for the retail sale of support services, wherever located.

(i) “Support services” means the following services provided by a provider:

(1) Domestic services and services related to domestic services.

(2) Heavy cleaning.

(3) Personal care services, as defined in subdivision (c).

(4) Accompaniment when needed during necessary travel to health-related appointments or to alternative resource sites.

(5) Yard hazard abatement.

(6) Protective supervision.

(7) Teaching and demonstration directed at reducing the need for other supportive services.

(8) Paramedical services that make it possible for the recipient to establish and maintain an independent living arrangement, including those necessary paramedical services that are ordered by a licensed health care professional who is lawfully authorized to do so, which persons could provide for themselves but for their functional limitations. Paramedical
 services include the administration of medications, puncturing the skin, or inserting a medical device into a body orifice, activities requiring sterile procedures, or other activities requiring judgment based on training given by a licensed health care professional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6151.

(a) Beginning on the date for which the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves implementation of the state plan amendment described in subdivision (c) of Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, but no earlier than January 1, 2012, for the privilege of selling support services at retail, the sales tax is hereby extended to all providers at the rate, as described in
 subdivision (b), of the gross receipts of any provider from the sale of all support services sold at retail in this state.

(b) The rate extended by subdivision (a) is the rate, as may be amended from time to time, imposed by Article 1 (commencing with Section 6051) plus the rate imposed by Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution for the privilege of selling tangible personal property at retail in this state.

(c) Notwithstanding the implementation date of this article as provided for in subdivision (a), no tax shall be collected pursuant to this article prior to the receipt of approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the implementation of Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 5.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6152.

For the efficient administration of this article and the collection of tax from providers, a seller shall register with the board, collect the tax from the provider, and report and pay the tax to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6154.

For the efficient administration of this article and the collection of tax from providers, Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 6470) of Chapter 5, pertaining to prepayment of taxes, shall not apply to sellers until no later than three months after the date that federal approval is obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6156.

A seller shall file with the board an application pursuant to Section 6066, which shall state that the applicant will actively engage in arranging for the retail sale of support services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6158.

After compliance by the seller with Section 6156 and by the seller and the board with Section 6067, the board shall grant and issue a permit or permits to each applicant pursuant to Section 6067, except that the board shall grant and issue a single permit to the State Department of Social Services without regard to its multiple places of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6160.

A permit issued pursuant to this article shall be held only by a seller that is actively engaged in arranging for the retail sale of support services. Any seller not so engaged shall forthwith surrender its permit to the board for cancellation. The board may revoke the permit of a seller found to be not actively engaged in arranging for the retail sale of support services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6162.

For purposes of Section 6486, a seller is a retailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6164.

Every provider and seller shall keep any records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6166.

The board, or any person authorized in writing by the board, may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any seller or provider, and may investigate the character of the business of the seller, pursuant to Section 7054.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6168.

Notwithstanding Section 7101, all revenues, less refunds, derived from the taxes extended by this article shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the State Department of Social Services
 for disbursement in the manner, and for the purposes, set forth in Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. All interest or other increment resulting from investment or deposit of moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section (as part of Article 4) conditionally operative as provided in Section 6170.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 6170.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.)
-------------------------------------------

6170.

(a) (1) This article shall become operative only if federal Medicaid approval sought by the Director of Health Care Services
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is granted.

(2) If approval is granted as described in paragraph (1), within 10 days of that approval the Director of Health Care Services shall notify the State Board of Equalization, and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, of the approval pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 12306.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The Department of Finance shall notify the board, within 10 days of the final decision, of a final decision by the California Supreme Court or any California Court of Appeal that the revenues collected pursuant to this article that are deposited in the Personal Care IHSS Quality Assurance Revenue Fund are “General Fund revenues which may be appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B” or “General Fund proceeds of
 taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, without regard to the validity of this section. This article shall become inoperative on the first day of the next calendar quarter following 30 days after the date of that final decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 6172.   Note: Subd. (a) prescribes conditions for operation of Article 4, commencing with Section 6150, and subd. (b) prescribes conditions for its inoperation.)
-------------------------------------------

6172.

This article shall remain in effect only until the January 1 following the date the tax extended by this article becomes inoperative pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6170, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 1612)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4, commencing with Section 6150. If Article 4 becomes inoperative (as prescribed in Section 6170), it will be repealed on January 1 following its inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Use Tax [6201. - 6249.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Tax [6201. - 6207.]

6201.

An excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer on or after July 1, 1935, for storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of 3 percent of the sales price of the property, and at the rate of 212 percent on and after July 1, 1943, and to and including June 30, 1949, and at the rate of 3 percent on and after July 1, 1949, and to and including July 31, 1967, and at the rate of 4 percent on and after August 1, 1967,
 and to and including June 30, 1972, and at the rate of 334 percent on and after July 1, 1972, and to and including June 30, 1973, and at the rate of 434 percent on and after July 1, 1973, and to and including September 30, 1973, and at the rate of 334 percent on and after October 1, 1973, and to and including March 31, 1974, and at the rate of 434 percent thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 5.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6201, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in the state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer on or after the operative date of this subdivision, for storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of 5 percent of the sales price of the property on and after the operative date of this subdivision.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall become operative on December 1, 1989, and shall cease to be
 operative on January 1, 1991.

(c) The rate prescribed by Section 6201 shall be applicable on and after the first day following the date subdivision (a) ceases to be operative pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 3.   Effective November 7, 1989.   Note: This section was applicable, and superseded the Section 6201 rate, from Dec. 1, 1989, until Jan. 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7101 or any other law, the amount of revenues, net of refunds, collected pursuant to Section 6201 and attributable to a rate of 1.0625 percent shall, subject to subdivision (b), be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, as established pursuant to Section 30025 of the Government Code, and shall be used exclusively for the public safety
 purposes for which that fund is created.

(b) The amount of revenues derived from any tax or tax increase enacted after July 1, 2011, that is deposited in the Local Revenue Fund 2011 shall be applied to reduce the amount otherwise required to be deposited in that fund pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the Director of Finance determines that the State Board of Equalization has allocated more revenue to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 than required by subdivisions (a) and (b) for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2016, inclusive, the total amount of revenues credited to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 for this period shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), and no allocation adjustment for this period shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 7.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.2.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed by Section 6201 and any other provision of this part, an excise tax is hereby imposed on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from any retailer on or after July 15, 1991,
 for storage, use, or other consumption in this state at the rate of 12 percent of the sales price of the property.

(b) All revenues received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) This section shall cease to be operative on the first day of the first month of the calendar quarter following notification to the board by the Department of Finance of a final judicial determination by the California Supreme Court or any California court of appeal that the revenues collected pursuant to this section and Section 6051.2 and deposited in the Local Revenue Fund are either of the following:

(1) “General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) “Allocated local proceeds of taxes,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.
